Utah statutes.
61-2g-502.   Disciplinary action -- Grounds.

(1) (a)  The board may order disciplinary action, with the concurrence of the division, against a person:

(i)  registered, licensed, or certified under this chapter; or

(ii)  required to be registered, licensed, or certified under this chapter.

(b)  On the basis of a ground listed in Subsection (2) for disciplinary action, board action may include:

(i)  revoking, suspending, or placing a person's registration, license, or certification on probation;

(ii)  denying a person's original registration, license, or certification;

(iii)  denying a person's renewal license, certification, or registration;

(iv)  in the case of denial or revocation of a registration, license, or certification, setting a waiting period for an applicant to apply for a registration, license, or certification under this chapter;

(v)  ordering remedial education;

(vi)  imposing a civil penalty upon a person not to exceed the greater of:

(A)  $5,000 for each violation; or

(B)  the amount of any gain or economic benefit from a violation;

(vii)  issuing a cease and desist order;

(viii)  modifying an action described in Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (vii) if the board, with the concurrence of the division, finds that the person complies with court ordered restitution; or

(ix)  doing any combination of Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (viii).

(c) (i)  If the board or division issues an order that orders a fine or educational requirements as part of the disciplinary action against a person, including a stipulation and order, the board or division shall state in the order the deadline by which the person shall comply with the fine or educational requirements.

(ii)  If a person fails to comply with a stated deadline:

(A)  the person's license, certificate, or registration is automatically suspended:

(I)  beginning on the day specified in the order as the deadline for compliance; and

(II)  ending the day on which the person complies in full with the order; and

(B)  if the person fails to pay a fine required by an order, the division may begin a collection process:

(I)  established by the division by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(II)  subject to Title 63A, Chapter 3, Part 5, Office of State Debt Collection.

(2)  The following are grounds for disciplinary action under this section:

(a)  procuring or attempting to procure a registration, license, or certification under this chapter:

(i)  by fraud; or

(ii)  by making a false statement, submitting false information, or making a material misrepresentation in an application filed with the division;

(b)  paying money or attempting to pay money other than a fee provided for by this chapter to a member or employee of the division to procure a registration, license, or certification under this chapter;

(c)  an act or omission in the practice of real estate appraising that constitutes dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation;

(d)  entry of a judgment against a registrant, licensee, or certificate holder on grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the making of an appraisal of real estate;

(e)  a guilty plea to a criminal offense involving moral turpitude that is held in abeyance, or a conviction, including a conviction based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of a criminal offense involving moral turpitude;

(f)  engaging in the business of real estate appraising under an assumed or fictitious name not properly registered in this state;

(g)  paying a finder's fee or a referral fee to a person not licensed or certified under this chapter in connection with an appraisal of real estate or real property in this state;

(h)  making a false or misleading statement in:

(i)  that portion of a written appraisal report that deals with professional qualifications; or

(ii)  testimony concerning professional qualifications;

(i)  violating or disregarding:

(i) this chapter;

(ii)  an order of:

(A)  the board; or

(B)  the division, in a case when the board delegates to the division the authority to make a decision on behalf of the board; or

(iii)  a rule issued under this chapter;

(j)  violating the confidential nature of governmental records to which a person registered, licensed, or certified under this chapter gained access through employment or engagement as an appraiser by a governmental agency;

(k)  accepting a contingent fee for performing an appraisal if in fact the fee is or was contingent upon:

(i)  the appraiser reporting a predetermined analysis, opinion, or conclusion;

(ii)  the analysis, opinion, conclusion, or valuation reached; or

(iii)  the consequences resulting from the appraisal assignment;

(l)  unprofessional conduct as defined by statute or rule;

(m)  in the case of a dual licensed title licensee as defined in Section 31A-2-402:

(i)  providing a title insurance product or service without the approval required by Section 31A-2-405; or

(ii)  knowingly providing false or misleading information in the statement required by Subsection 31A-2-405(2); or

(n)  other conduct that constitutes dishonest dealing.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

